Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.41
Applicability of act; persons
not considered dealer.

(1) Nothing in the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act
shall apply to the State of Nebraska or any of its agencies or subdivisions.

(2) No insurance
company, finance company, public utility company, fleet owner, or other person
coming into possession of any motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer, as an
incident to its regular business, who sells or exchanges the motor vehicle,
motorcycle, or trailer shall be considered a dealer except persons whose regular
business is leasing or renting motor vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 53.